California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 Code or Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code, the department may use an alternative method to purchase environmental mitigation credits from a mitigation bank, conservation bank, or in-lieu fee program, mitigation credit agreement, or other mitigation credit provider for the purpose of fulfilling mitigation responsibilities for natural resources or for advance mitigation purposes, as specified in Section 800.6, if the environmental mitigation credits are solicited through a process, as determined by the department in cooperation with the Department of General Services, that includes a solicitation or evaluation of cost and the availability of environmental mitigation credits.

(c) The department and a governmental entity, a special district, a nonprofit organization, a community foundation, or a congressionally chartered foundation may enter into a cooperative agreement at any time
 to hold, manage, and invest an endowment for an environmental mitigation property, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 104, and disburse payments from the endowment to the holder of the property consistent with the fund agreement.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Community foundation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65965 of the Government Code.

(2) “Congressionally chartered foundation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65965 of the Government Code.

(3) “Environmental mitigation credit” means a unit of mitigation as determined in a mitigation or conservation bank enabling instrument, as defined in Section 1797.5 of the Fish and Game Code, in-lieu fee program instrument, mitigation credit
 agreement, or other agreement approved by a state or federal regulatory agency.

(4) “In-lieu fee program” has the same meaning as provided in Section 332.2 of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations or Section 230.92 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) “Mitigation bank” or “conservation bank” means an entity as defined in subdivision (d) or (f) of Section 1797.5 of the Fish and Game Code or as defined as a “mitigation bank” in Section 332.2 of Title 33 to the Code of Federal Regulations or Section 230.92 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Mitigation credit agreement” means a mitigation credit agreement approved by the Department of Fish and Wildlife pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(7) “Nonprofit organization” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65965 of the Government Code.

(e) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Endowments or other agreements entered into pursuant to this section before December 31, 2033, shall remain in effect beyond that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 4.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

126.1.

(a) The department may enter into agreements, which shall provide funding as necessary, with governmental, nonprofit, and for-profit entities for the purpose of mitigating environmental impacts caused by transportation projects, for maintaining environmental mitigation property, as defined in Section 104, or for advance mitigation purposes, as provided in Section 800.6. These agreements may provide for the advancement of funds as necessary.

(b) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Agreements entered into pursuant to this section before December 31, 2033, shall
 remain in effect beyond that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 5.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

126.2.

(a) (1) Agreements between the department and governmental, nonprofit, and for-profit entities pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 126 and Section 126.1 shall be in accordance, as applicable, with the requirements of Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. For federally imposed requirements, the department is subject to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, as applicable, to the extent not in conflict with federal law or regulation.

(2) Where feasible, a governmental entity holding property pursuant to paragraph (1) shall have the principal responsibility for natural resource protection or conservation. A
 governmental entity holding property pursuant to this section shall be approved through the due diligence process set forth in Section 65967 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Agreements entered into pursuant to this section before December 31, 2033, shall remain in effect beyond that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 6.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

126.3.

(a) By July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter until July 1, 2033, the department shall provide a written report to the relevant legislative policy and budget committees that includes at least the following information about its environmental mitigation program:

(1) The total number of endowments and new endowments, the amount of funds held in endowments and new endowments, the holder of each endowment, and the moneys disbursed for each endowment, in the preceding calendar year.

(2) The environmental mitigation properties purchased or transferred, and the status of each environmental mitigation property, in the preceding calendar year.

(3) A summary of each of the mitigation and advanced mitigation agreements entered into by the department in the preceding calendar year.

(4) Recommendations to address any identified barriers to implementation of the environmental mitigation program.

(b) If any information required to be reported in subdivision (a) is also provided in the report required by subdivision (f) of Section 800.6, reference to the latter is sufficient to comply with the reporting requirements of this section.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 7.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

127.

The California Highway Patrol shall cooperate with the department in the enforcement of the closing, or restriction of use, of any State highway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

128.

The department shall maintain, in each district office, a file of its final construction plans and right-of-way record maps for all completed state highway projects located within the district. The department may file, in the office of the recorder of the county in which any state highway is located, such plans, maps, or drawings of each state highway as the department deems necessary in the public interest, which the county recorder shall accept and file without fee. No certificate need be attached thereto other than the usual title of the department showing the approval of such plans, maps, or drawings by the proper officer or engineer of the
 department.

All maps filed in the office of a county recorder pursuant to this section shall conform to the provisions of this paragraph. The map shall be legibly drawn, printed, or reproduced by a process that provides a permanent record. Each sheet of paper or other material used for such map shall be 22 by 36 inches in size, shall have clearly shown therein the particular number of the sheet, the total number of sheets comprising the map, and its relation to each adjoining sheet, and shall have encompassing its border a line that leaves a blank margin one inch in width, except that the left side margin shall be two inches in width. In any county using a microfilm system, such plans, maps, or drawings may be microfilmed in lieu of filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

129.

Each county recorder shall keep all such state highway plans, maps, or drawings filed in separate map books provided by the department for that purpose and each designated “State Highway Map Book No. ____, __________ County.” Each such plan, map, or drawing shall be numbered in the order of filing and indexed in a separate index showing the number and the date of filing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

130.

The department and any county, city, or joint highway district, or any of them, may enter into a contract in respect to the proportion of the expense of the acquisition, construction, improvement or maintenance of any state highway to be borne by the respective parties to such contract. Any such contract may provide for the advancement of funds, for the acquisition of rights of way and for the doing of the work, or any portion thereof, by any party to the contract, pursuant to the laws governing such party with reference to such type of acquisition or such character of work.

Any money appropriated for the acquisition of rights of way
 for the construction, improvement or maintenance of county highways, city streets, or joint highway district roads may be expended in such acquisition, construction, improvement or maintenance of any state highway located in whole or in part within the limits of such city, county, or joint highway district, pursuant to such contract, and shall be made available therefor by resolution of the governing body of the city, county, or joint highway district, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

130.1.

Upon the completion of the improvement of any portion of any state highway constructed pursuant to Section 130 by the party designated in the contract, the governing body of such party may, and upon the completion of the whole of any such highway the governing body shall, adopt a resolution declaring such completion and transmit a copy of the resolution to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

130.2.

Upon receipt of the resolution of completion by the director, the control of the state highway, or the portion thereof, declared completed by the resolution shall revert to the State of California and the state shall be liable for its future maintenance and care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

130.5.

The department may enter into a contract with the Federal authority in charge of any National monument with respect to the portion of the expense of the acquisition, construction, improvement or maintenance of any State highway within such monument to be borne by the respective parties to such contract. The contract may provide for the construction, improvement or maintenance of the highway wholly by such Federal authority. No such contract shall limit in any respect the right of the public to use the highway in accordance with laws applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

131.

Upon the application of the governing authority of any county, city, or other governmental agency, the department may:

(a) Aid in establishing grades and drainage systems for highways.

(b) Advise with any such authority as to the construction, improvement, or maintenance of highways.

(c) Prepare plans, specifications, or estimates for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of highways.

(d) Act as
 the consulting engineer for any such authority.

(e) Accept moneys from any such governmental unit for deposit in the State Treasury to the credit of any state fund which the department designates. The department shall use such moneys for the acquisition, construction, improvement, or maintenance of highways situated within such governmental unit, in accordance with the plans, specifications, and terms agreed upon. The governing authority of any such governmental unit may pay into the State Treasury, as provided in this subdivision, any moneys in its treasury or raised by the issuance of bonds, which moneys are available for use by such authority for highway purposes.

Any county, by resolution of the board of supervisors, may authorize the State Controller to deduct, from any apportionments to it from the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund or the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the
 Transportation Tax Fund, such amounts as the county may desire to be paid to the department for any work to be done in accordance with this subdivision. Upon such authorization, the State Controller shall transfer such moneys to such fund as the department may designate.

(f) Accept such compensation as may be agreed upon by such authority and the director for engineering services rendered to such authority.

(g) Advance moneys, where the director determines that such advance can be made without interference with state highway work, for emergency construction or maintenance work on highways by state forces, or by state contractor, in cases of disaster due to storms or floods where (1) the Governor has declared an emergency pursuant to Section 188.1, and (2) the agency or agencies having jurisdiction over such highway or highways have, by resolution or contract, agreed to reimburse
 the department, from succeeding Highway User Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund apportionments or other sources specified in such resolution or contract and available to such agency or agencies for highway purposes, for the entire cost of the work, including not to exceed 10 percent for overhead and administration. In the event such resolution or contract specifies reimbursement from future apportionments to the agency or agencies by the State Controller, the State Controller shall transfer such moneys, in such manner and over such period as may be specified in the resolution or contract, to such fund as the department may designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

131.1.

Upon the request of any service authority for freeway emergencies that has imposed additional fees on vehicles pursuant to Section 9250.10 of the Vehicle Code, the department may contract with the authority for the installation, operation, and maintenance of motorist call boxes on portions of the California Freeway and Expressway System within the county. The service authority shall reimburse the department for all costs incurred under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1132, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

131.5.

The department and any county having a park commission may enter into and carry out cooperative agreements for the grading, development, planting and maintenance of roadside areas along any State highway and within the right of way thereof and providing that the department be reimbursed for any expenditure incurred by it. Counties entering into such agreement are authorized to indicate such roadside parks and their approaches by suitable signs in the manner and to the extent provided in any such agreement. It is a misdemeanor for any person to park any house trailer in any such roadside park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 458.)
-------------------------------------------

132.

For any cooperation rendered under the provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), (c) or (d) of section 131, the department may require the applicant to pay any portion of the expense, and in such event the department shall determine what amount such applicant shall pay.

Any expense incurred in carrying out the objects of any provision of section 131 is part of the administrative expense of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

133.

To the extent possible, and where feasible and cost effective, the department shall partner with appropriate public agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Parks and Recreation, any federal department or agency, and any regional or local public entity, to develop strategies and plans to improve access for bicycles and pedestrians to federal, state, regional, and local
 parks adjacent to or connected to the state highway system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   (AB 2615)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

134.

In the expenditure of funds allocated under Sections 2107 and 2117 for expenditure on other than state highways, the department may, upon the application of the governing body of the city, acquire in the name of the city real property, or any interest therein, for any of the purposes provided for in those sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

134.5.

Whenever by the construction or improvement of a State highway, changes are necessitated in streets or highways not a part of the State highway system, or in other publicly owned facilities, which require the acquisition of real property or interests therein, the department may acquire such real property in the name of the governmental agency in charge of the street, highway or other facility. This section shall not impose any liability upon the State where it would not otherwise exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 197.)
-------------------------------------------

135.

The department may enter into contracts for the removal or relocation of structures or improvements situated upon real property over which a right-of-way for state highway purposes has been or is to be acquired. Nothing in this section limits or restricts the authority of the department to make agreements authorized by Section 1263.610 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

135.3.

The Legislature intends by this act to provide prompt and equitable relocation assistance to low-income individuals and families displaced because of the construction of state highway projects in areas where the market value of real property is economically depressed. The Legislature by establishing a replacement housing program for such individuals and families intends to accomplish this objective of providing housing which is decent, safe, sanitary, and functionally equivalent to the housing eliminated by highway construction. Such replacement housing program shall be coordinated with the relocation advisory assistance provided by the department in accordance with Section
 156.5. The Legislature further intends that to the extent the department deems feasible such housing shall be supplied by existing housing, moved housing, and refurbished housing before new replacement housing is constructed on a volume basis.

The Legislature finds that the foregoing objectives can best be achieved by enabling low-income persons in economically depressed areas affected by state highway construction to participate in the development and execution of the replacement housing program. Accordingly, when the initial replacement housing program is undertaken for the assistance of persons displaced by the construction of State Highway Route 105 in Los Angeles County, such program shall be conducted in a manner conducive to maximum community participation, thereby assisting in alleviation of excessive unemployment by utilizing local labor and contributing to the development of training programs for unskilled labor.

The Legislature further finds that conventional contracting procedures, including competitive bidding, may not be consistent with the attainment of these objectives. Therefore, in carrying out this initial replacement housing program on State Highway Route 105, the department may enter into the contracts contemplated by Section 135.7 pursuant to such procedures as the director determines to be best suited to the achievement of the maximum community participation consistent with the economical completion of the freeway projects.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the exemption from competitive bidding authorized by this section is made by reason of the unique nature of the initial replacement housing program on State Highway Route 105, and is not to be considered as establishing a precedent for exempting any other public works construction from competitive bidding and other conventional contracting procedures, nor as
 in derogation of the fundamental policy of the Legislature that contractors for public works be selected by competitive bidding in order to secure economy of construction and other benefits which accrue to the public by reason of such contracting procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

135.4.

As used in Sections 135.3, 135.4, 135.5, 135.6, and 135.7:

(a) “Low-income individuals and families” means those persons who lack the financial ability and income necessary to obtain replacement housing.

(b) “Economically depressed area” means an area which the commission by resolution determines to meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The state highway project is located in an area consisting principally of housing occupied by low-income individuals and families.

(2) An adequate number of replacement housing units for low-income individuals and families is not available in the immediate area of the state highway project.

(3) Relocation advisory assistance will be insufficient to place a majority of such individuals and families in replacement housing in the immediate area of the state highway project.

(c) “Replacement housing” means functionally camparable single or multiple dwelling units which are decent, safe, and sanitary for low-income individuals and families.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 953.)
-------------------------------------------

135.5.

(a) As used in this section, “relocation assistance” means, and shall be limited to, that assistance reasonably necessary to place low-income individuals and families who lack the financial ability and income to obtain replacement housing without relocation assistance, and who own and reside in housing in an economically depressed area and who are displaced because of the acquisition or clearance of right-of-way for a project on the state highway system, in replacement housing in the same relative economic ownership position as before displacement by transferring or exchanging their right, title, and interest in property required for state highway purposes
 for the right, title, and interest in replacement housing.

(b) The department is authorized to provide relocation assistance to low-income individuals and families who own and reside in housing in an economically depressed area and who are displaced because of the acquisition or clearance of rights-of-way for a project on the state highway system, which project is located in an economically depressed area.

(c) The department is authorized to adopt rules and regulations to implement this section. Such rules and regulations shall include provisions relating to: 

(1) The methods and priorities for placing such low-income individuals and families in replacement housing.

(2) The standards for determining the relative economic ownership position of such
 low-income individuals and families before displacement. The department in determining such standards shall consider the equity value and monthly payments of principal and interest, the availability of federal housing programs, and such other similar ownership factors.

(3) The standards for determining which of such low-income individuals and families lack the financial ability and income necessary to obtain replacement housing without relocation assistance.

(4) The procedure for transferring or exchanging right, title, and interest in property required for state highway purposes for the right, title, and interest in replacement housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 953.)
-------------------------------------------

135.6.

The department may acquire, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, any unimproved or unoccupied real property, or real property not devoted primarily to residential use, to provide replacement housing for low-income individuals and families who reside in economically depressed areas and are displaced becuase of the acquisition or clearance of rights-of-way for a project on the state highway system, in order to enable them to live in decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings. All other property acquired for such purpose shall be acquired by means other than condemnation. The acquisition of such property is declared to be a public purpose and use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 953.)
-------------------------------------------

135.7.

The department may contract with other public agencies, private individuals, and corporations for the financing, planning, development, construction, management, sale, exchange, or lease of replacement housing. Low-income individuals and families displaced because of the acquisition or clearance of rights-of-way for a project on the state highway system shall be given priority in buying, leasing, transferring, or exchanging property for replacement housing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 953.)
-------------------------------------------

136.

The department may enter into contracts for the leasing or renting of tools or equipment for State highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 514.)
-------------------------------------------

136.1.

The department may enter into major damage mitigation contracts to perform major damage repairs and operations on state highways when caused by sudden, unforeseen events such as storms, landslides, flooding, high surf, earthquakes or other geological action, or civil unrest. These contracts may be entered into prior to the onset of major damage in order to retain the contractor in readiness to respond to incidents as needed. Work performed under each contract shall be limited to physical construction, demolition, debris removal, and traffic control. The work shall be
 considered, for funding purposes, as a public works construction project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

136.5.

(a) The contracts referred to in Sections 135, 136, and 136.1 are not subject to the State Contract Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code). Except for emergency work of the type described in subdivision (b), whenever the estimated amount of a contract exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), it shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, after competitive bidding on any reasonable notice that the department may prescribe. Posting of notice for five days in a public place in the district office within which the work is to be done, or the equipment used, is sufficient. Those contracts shall be subject to the applicable payment bond provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section
 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The department may require faithful performance bonds when considered necessary. The advertisement for each contract shall state whether or not a bond shall be required.

(b) In cases of emergency work necessitated by the imminence or occurrence of a landslide, flood, storm damage, accident, or other casualty, tools or equipment may be rented for a period of not to exceed 60 days without competitive bidding, and the department may waive the requirements of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code to the extent that a contractor may commence performance of the work under the contract for the rental of tools or equipment prior to filing a payment bond with the department. In that case, no payment shall be made to the contractor until a payment bond covering all work of the contract is filed with the
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 104.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

136.6.

(a) The department may enter into contracts not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the leasing and renting of operated heavy highway equipment for state highway maintenance purposes, which contracts are not subject to the State Contract Act pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 136.5, and the department is not required to comply with the procedures described in subdivision (a) of that section relative to those contracts. Contracts exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the leasing and renting of operated heavy
 highway equipment for state highway maintenance purposes shall be subject to the procedures described in subdivision (a) of Section 136.5.

(b) For purposes of this section, “operated heavy highway equipment” shall mean bulldozers, grinders, loaders, pavers, oilers, rollers, excavators, truck tractors and trailers, fork lifts, personnel lifts, sweepers, and water tankers that include within the leasing or rental costs the cost of the qualified operator of the equipment.

(c) This section shall not apply to contracts for the leasing or renting of operated heavy highway equipment for emergency work, which are governed by subdivision (b) of Section 136.5. This section shall not apply to the leasing or renting of operated heavy highway equipment to be utilized for new highway construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 357, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

137.

The department shall determine the kind, quality, and extent of all highway work done under its control, and may prepare and approve all plans, specifications, and estimates for all such work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

137.6.

The design of, the drafting of specifications for, and the inspection and approval of state highway structures shall be by civil engineers licensed pursuant to the Professional Engineers Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), Division 3, Business and Professions Code).

The approval of plans for, and the inspection and approval of, temporary structures erected by contractors in connection with the construction of state highway structures shall also be by such licensed civil engineers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

138.

The department may employ an attorney at law and such assistant attorneys as are necessary, said attorney to act as the attorney and legal adviser of the department in all highway matters. No contract, relating to highways, awarded by the department shall be binding on the State until it is approved in writing by the Attorney General or by the attorney so employed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

139.

The director or the Chief Engineer of the department may require verbal or written reports from any officer, assistant, or employee of the department regarding state highway matters with which such officer, assistant, or employee is engaged. Any officer, assistant, or employee who knowingly renders a false report to the director or the Chief Engineer is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

140.

The department may establish and maintain shops for the construction, repair, and servicing of any equipment owned or used by the department. The department may purchase and supply such materials and parts, and furnish such labor, as is necessary in the construction, repair, and servicing of equipment for other state departments. The other state departments receiving them shall reimburse the department for the cost of such materials, parts, and labor, including overhead charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

140.3.

Effective June 30, 2006, the Equipment Service Fund in the State Treasury is abolished and all moneys in the fund shall be transferred to the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund. Any outstanding liabilities and encumbrances of the Equipment Service Fund as of June 30, 2006, shall become liabilities and encumbrances payable from the State Highway Account.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 56, Sec. 9.   Effective July 7, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

140.5.

The department may do anything, including the prosecution of any action, necessary to collect any amounts owing to the State as a result of any activity of the department, and may settle any of such claims with or without court action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

141.

In addition to the other powers relating to state highways granted to it by law, the department may do all of the following:

(a) Make investigations to place, at the service of the state, the most approved methods of highway construction, improvement, and maintenance.

(b) Compile statistics relative to the highways of the various counties and cities and of the districts formed to construct, improve, or maintain the highways.

(c) Determine the methods of highway
 construction, improvement, and maintenance best adapted to the various sections of the state, and the best methods of construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways, making experiments with respect thereto from time to time.

(d) Call upon any state, county, city, or district official to furnish any information the official has relating to, or is in any way necessary to the proper performance of, the highway work of the department. The official shall furnish the information without charge.

(e) Join associations of highway and transportation officials of other states and others which have been established for not less than 10 years, having as their purpose the interchange of information relating to highway construction, improvement, maintenance, and administration and other transportation matters.

(f) Direct
 any of its officers or employees to travel to places outside this state at state expense for the purposes, when approved, as provided in Section 11032 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

142.

All expense incurred in carrying out the objects of section 141 is part of the administrative expense of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

143.

(a) (1) “Best value” means a value determined by objective criteria, including, but not limited to, price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, and other criteria deemed appropriate by the department or the regional transportation agency.

(2) “Contracting entity or lessee” means a public or private entity, or consortia thereof, that has entered into a comprehensive development lease agreement with the department or a regional transportation agency for a transportation project pursuant to this section.

(3) “Design-build” means a procurement process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single
 entity.

(4) “Regional transportation agency” means any of the following:

(A) A transportation planning agency as defined in Section 29532 or 29532.1 of the Government Code.

(B) A county transportation commission as defined in Section 130050, 130050.1, or 130050.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(C) Any other local or regional transportation entity that is designated by statute as a regional transportation agency.

(D) A joint exercise of powers authority as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, with the consent of a transportation planning agency or a county transportation commission for the jurisdiction in which the
 transportation project will be developed.

(5) “Public Infrastructure Advisory Commission” means a unit or auxiliary organization established by the Transportation Agency that advises the department and regional transportation agencies in developing transportation projects through performance-based infrastructure partnerships.

(6) “Transportation project” means one or more of the following: planning, design, development, finance, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, acquisition, lease, operation, or maintenance of highway, public street, rail, or related facilities supplemental to existing facilities currently owned and operated by the department or regional transportation agencies that is consistent with the requirements of subdivision (c).

(b) (1) The Public Infrastructure
 Advisory Commission shall do all of the following:

(A) Identify transportation project opportunities throughout the state.

(B) Research and document similar transportation projects throughout the state, nationally, and internationally, and further identify and evaluate lessons learned from these projects.

(C) Assemble and make available to the department or regional transportation agencies a library of information, precedent, research, and analysis concerning infrastructure partnerships and related types of public-private transactions for public infrastructure.

(D) Advise the department and regional transportation agencies, upon request, regarding infrastructure partnership suitability and best practices.

(E) Provide, upon request, procurement-related services to the department and regional transportation agencies for infrastructure partnership.

(2) The Public Infrastructure Advisory Commission may charge a fee to the department and regional transportation agencies for the services described in subparagraphs (D) and (E) of paragraph (1), the details of which shall be articulated in an agreement entered into between the Public Infrastructure Advisory Commission and the department or the regional transportation agency.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the department, in cooperation with regional transportation agencies, and regional transportation agencies, may solicit proposals, accept unsolicited proposals, negotiate, and enter into comprehensive development lease agreements
 with public or private entities, or consortia thereof, for transportation projects.

(2) Projects proposed pursuant to this section and associated lease agreements shall be submitted to the California Transportation Commission. The commission, at a regularly scheduled public hearing, shall select the candidate projects from projects nominated by the department or a regional transportation agency after reviewing the nominations for consistency with paragraphs (3) and (4). Approved projects may proceed with the process described in paragraph (5).

(3) The projects authorized pursuant to this section shall be primarily designed to achieve the following performance objectives:

(A) Improve mobility by improving travel times or reducing the number of vehicle hours of delay in the affected corridor.

(B) Improve the operation or safety of the affected corridor.
